Utah statutes.
62A-15-604.   Receipt of gift -- Transfer of persons from other institutions.

(1)  The division may take and hold by gift, devise, or bequest real and personal property required for the use of the state hospital.  With the approval of the governor it may convert that property which is not suitable for its use into money or property that is suitable for that use.

(2)  The state hospital is authorized to receive from any other institution within the department any person committed to that institution, when a careful evaluation of the treatment needs of the person and of the treatment programs available at the state hospital indicates that the transfer would be in the interest of that person.

(3) (a)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 62A-1-111(10), the state hospital is authorized to receive gifts, grants, devises, and donations and shall deposit them into an interest-bearing restricted special revenue fund.  The state treasurer may invest the fund and all interest is to remain with the fund.

(b)  Those gifts, grants, devises, donations, and the proceeds thereof shall be used by the superintendent or his designee for the use and benefit of patients at the state hospital.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

